Utah statutes.
53A-9-103.   Authorized components.
Career ladders may include the following components:
(1) (a) An extended contract year for teachers, providing for additional paid
nonteaching days beyond the regular school year for curriculum development and
other professional development activities.
(b)  School boards may approve individual exceptions to the extended year
contract.
(2) At the option of the local school board, an extended contract year for
teachers, providing for additional paid workdays beyond the regular school
year for teaching assignments in summer school, remedial, disabled,
specialized, applied technology, gifted and talented, and adult education
programs.
(3) A fair and consistent procedure:
(a)  for selecting teachers who will be given additional responsibilities; and
(b)  which incorporates clearly stated job descriptions and qualifications for
each level on the career ladder.
(4) (a) A program of differentiated staffing that provides additional
compensation and, as appropriate, additional extensions of the contract year,
for those who assume additional instruction-related responsibilities such as:
(i)  assisting students and mentoring beginning teachers;
(ii)  curriculum and lesson plan development;
(iii)  helping established teachers improve their teaching skills;
(iv)  volunteer training;
(v)  planning;
(vi)  facilities and productivity improvements; and
(vii)  educational assignments directed at establishing positive relationships
with the community, businesses, and parents.
(b)  Administrative and extracurricular activities are not considered
additional instruction-related activities under this Subsection (4).
(5) (a) A well defined program of evaluation and mentoring for beginning
teachers, consistent with Subsections 53A-1a-104(7) and 53A-6-102(2)(a) and
(b), designed to assist those teachers during provisional years of teaching to
acquire and demonstrate the skills required of capable, successful teachers.
(b)  Continuation in teaching from year to year shall be contingent upon
satisfactory teaching performance.
(6) A clear and concise explanation of the evaluation system components,
including the respective roles of parents, teachers, administrators, and the
school board in the development of the evaluation system and provisions for
frequent, comprehensive evaluations of teachers with less than three years'
teaching experience and periodic evaluations of other teachers consistent with
Subsections 53A-1a-104(7) and 53A-6-102(2)(a) and (b).
(7) (a) A program of advancement on the career ladder contingent upon
effective teaching performance, evidence of which may include formal
evaluation and assessment of student progress.
(b)  Student progress shall play a significant role in teacher evaluation.
(c)  Other criteria may include formal preparation and successful teaching
experience.
(8) An assessment of implementation costs.
(9) A plan for periodic review of the career ladder, including the makeup of
the reviewing entity, procedures to be followed during review, and the time
schedule for the review.
